Mississippi, session 2026, HB1506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The segment of Mississippi Highway 16 located in Kemper County, Mississippi, commencing at a point to be designated by the local governing authority within whose jurisdiction the segment is situated, and extending for a distance of approximately one (1) mile, is designated and shall be known as the "Samuel Tisdale Memorial Highway." (2)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.